Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.170

Probate of escheat property—Notice to department of revenue.

Escheat property may be probated under the provisions of the probate laws of this state. Whenever such probate proceedings are instituted, whether by special administration or otherwise, the petitioner shall promptly notify the department of revenue in writing thereof on forms furnished by the department of revenue to the county clerks. Thereafter, the department of revenue shall be served with written notice at least twenty days prior to any hearing on proceedings involving the valuation or sale of property, on any petition for the allowance of fees, and on all interim reports, final accounts or petitions for the determination of heirship. Like notice shall be given of the presentation of any claims to the court for allowance. Failure to furnish such notice shall be deemed jurisdictional and any order of the court entered without such notice shall be void. The department of revenue may waive the provisions of this section in its discretion. The department shall be deemed to have waived its right to administer in such probate proceedings under RCW 11.28.120(5) unless application for appointment of the director or the director's designee is made within forty days immediately following receipt of notice of institution of proceedings.

[ 1994 c 221 s 3; 1990 c 225 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 2; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.170. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.